Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6023
Involuntary transfer or discharge; notice; contents.

(1) The notice required by subsection (2) of section 71-6022 shall contain:

(a) The stated reason for the proposed transfer or discharge;

(b) The effective date of the proposed transfer or discharge; and

(c) In not less than twelve-point type, the text of section 71-445.

(2) A copy of the notice required by subsection (2) of section 71-6022 shall be transmitted to the resident and the resident's representative, if a representative has been designated.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 16;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 125.